Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-532
Act; when operative.

The Nebraska Redevelopment Act becomes operative on February 1, 1995, and shall apply to all area applications and project applications filed on or after such date.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 32.